dev/apertium-mar.mar.dix
    <pardef n="खा/णे__vblex">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p></e> 
      <e>       <p><l>णे</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊ</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>शील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>एन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तील</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ला</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ले</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ऊन</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ता</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तो</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ते</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>तात</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ण्याची</l><r>णे<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Postpositions -->
    <pardef n="दा__post">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->

    <pardef n="एक__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="असेल"><i>असेल</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="कडे"><i>कडे</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="की"><i>की</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="तर"><i>तर</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="दा"><i>दा</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="पण"><i>पण</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="यांना"><i>यांना</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ला"><i>ला</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="ली"><i>ली</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="वर"><i>वर</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="शकले"><i>शकले</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="साठी"><i>साठी</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="सारख"><i>सारख</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="सूद्धा"><i>सूद्धा</i><par n="दा__post"/></e>
    <e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="दोन"><i>दोन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="चार"><i>चार</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पाच"><i>पाच</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सहा"><i>सहा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सात"><i>सात</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="आठ"><i>आठ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="नऊ"><i>नऊ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="दहा"><i>दहा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="अकरा"><i>अकरा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="बारा"><i>बारा</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="खाणे"><i>खा</i><par n="खा/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जाणे"><i>जा</i><par n="खा/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="देणे"><i>दे</i><par n="खा/णे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पिणे"><i>पि</i><par n="खा/णे__vblex"/></e>
